Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-213
Commercial fish, defined.

Commercial fish means those species of fish, other than baitfish, as listed in rules and regulations of the commission, allowed to be harvested from the wild or bought, sold, or bartered for economic gain.

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 23.